Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 7 Producers’ Cooperatives

7-7-1.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the term:

“Agricultural products” or “products” means field crops, horticultural, viticultural, forestry, nut, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee, and all farm products and the byproducts derived from any of them; and words used import the singular or the plural as the context demands;

“Association” means any corporation formed under this chapter;

“Member” means a person who owns a common stock in an association formed with capital stock, or who owns a certificate of membership in an association formed without capital stock;

“Person” means an individual, a partnership, a corporation, an association, or two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-1

.

7-7-2.
Power to form associations.

Five (5) or more persons of lawful age engaged in the production of agricultural products, or two (2) or more nonprofit cooperative associations of producers, organized under the provisions of this chapter, may form a nonprofit cooperative association with or without capital stock for the purpose of producing, handling, processing, preparing for market, warehousing, financing, preserving, drying, canning, packing, manufacturing, utilizing, and marketing the agricultural products of its members or for engaging in any activity pertaining to any of the things enumerated, including the financing, purchasing, or otherwise securing for its members supplies, equipment, machinery, or commodities of any character.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-2

.

7-7-3.
Contents and filing of articles of association.

The persons shall sign and file in duplicate written articles of association, which shall be signed by all of the incorporators and which shall be acknowledged by them in the manner in which deeds of real estate are required to be acknowledged within this state, and the residences of the incorporators shall be stated opposite their names. In the articles of association, the incorporators shall recite that they desire to become incorporated under the provisions of this chapter and shall state:

The name of the association, which shall contain the word “cooperative” and which shall not be the same as that of any other association or corporation formed or doing business in this state or so similar in name as to be likely to be confused with it.

The objects or purposes for which it is formed.

The place where its principal office is to be located.

The term for which it is to exist.

Whether formed with or without capital stock, and if formed with capital stock, the total amount of the authorized capital stock of the corporation, the number of shares into which the stock is divided and the par value of each share, except in the case of a corporation having stock or any class of stock without par value, in which case the articles of association regarding the stock, in lieu of the above, shall state the total number of shares authorized and that they are without par value; the restrictions, if any, imposed on the transfer of stock; and, if there be two (2) or more classes of stock, a description of the different classes and a statement of the terms on which they are created.

In addition to the above, the articles of incorporation of any association incorporated under this chapter may contain any provision consistent with law with respect to management, regulation, government, financing, indebtedness, membership, the establishment of voting districts and the election of delegates for representative purposes, the issuance, retirement, and transfer of its stock, if formed with capital stock, or any provisions relative to the manner in which it operates or as to its members, officers, or directors and any other provisions relating to its affairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-3

.

7-7-4.
Incorporation fee — Certificate — Articles as evidence.

Upon the filing of the articles of association and a duplicate of the articles with the secretary of state, together with an incorporation fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) and the duplicate copy certified to by the secretary of state and returned to the incorporator, the original articles of incorporation, or certified copies of them, shall be received in all the courts of this state and elsewhere as prima facie evidence of the facts contained in them and of the due incorporation of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-4

; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 28; P.L. 1971, ch. 164, § 1.

7-7-5.
Associations deemed nonprofit.

Associations organized under this chapter are deemed nonprofit, insofar as they are not organized as to make profits for themselves as such or for their members as such but only for their members as producers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-5

.

7-7-6.
General powers of associations.

Each association incorporated under this chapter has power and authority to:

Have perpetual succession in its corporate name unless a period for its duration is limited in its articles of association;

Sue and be sued in its corporate name;

Have and use a common seal and alter the seal at pleasure;

Elect any officers and appoint any agents that its business requires and to fix their compensation and define their duties;

Issue shares of capital stock or certificates of membership to its members, and to transfer, retire, or cancel them, as authorized by law, or by the articles of association or bylaws adopted in conformity with law;

Buy, lease, or hold any real or personal property necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of the business or incidental to it;

Enter into contracts with its members for periods not over ten (10) years requiring them to sell or market all or a specified part of their products to or through the association;

Employ any lawful means or methods for financing its transactions or operations;

Borrow money and to make advance payments and other advances to members;

Act as agent or representative of any member or members in carrying out the objects of the association;

Receive and employ warehouse receipts or other written instruments covering products of members stored on farms or elsewhere under suitable conditions issued or executed by any warehouseman, warehousing association, or other entity, which products may or may not have been inspected by inspectors licensed or authorized to inspect, sample, classify, grade, or weigh agricultural products under state or federal laws and which warehouse receipts or other written instruments may or may not be accompanied by the certificate or certificates issued by the inspectors on the products;

Form or become a member or stockholder of other nonprofit associations of producers, and to admit to membership or to sell stock to, other nonprofit associations of producers;

Adopt bylaws consistent with law providing for any matter or thing relative to the control, operation, maintenance, management, regulation, government, financing, indebtedness, the establishment of voting districts and the election of delegates for representative purposes; membership, the termination of it; stock (if formed with capital stock), its issuance, retirement, purchase, or transfer; or with respect to members, directors, or officers; and any other bylaws pertaining to its affairs;

Do everything necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of any one or more of the purposes; or the attainment of any one or more of the objects enumerated in these provisions; or the objects or purposes for which formed, and to contract and act accordingly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-6

.

7-7-7.
Bylaws.

Each association incorporated under this chapter shall, within thirty (30) days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management a code of bylaws consistent with these provisions. A two-thirds (2/3) vote of the members present at any meeting at which a quorum is present is necessary to adopt bylaws or make any change or amendment of them if notice of the adoption, change, or amendment was included in the call of the meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 7; P.L. 1932, ch. 1917, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-7

.

7-7-8.
Qualifications of members.

Only persons, or associations of persons, engaged in the production of the agricultural products as the association is authorized to handle, including lessees and landlords receiving these products as rent, shall be eligible to membership therein, subject to the terms and conditions prescribed in its articles of incorporation or bylaws consistent herewith. Following the ascertainment through procedure set forth in its bylaws that a member has ceased to be eligible to membership in an association, his or her rights therein may be suspended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-8

; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 8.

7-7-9.
Membership certificates — Settlement on termination of membership.

Every association formed under this chapter without capital stock shall issue a certificate of membership to each member which, unless otherwise provided in its articles of incorporation or bylaws, is nontransferable. In the case of associations organized without capital stock, in the event of the death, withdrawal, or expulsion of a member, the board of directors shall, within a reasonable time, equitably and conclusively ascertain the amount of the member’s interest in the association, which shall be paid him or her or his or her legal representative by the association in whole or in yearly partial payments within five (5) years from ascertainment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-9

.

7-7-10.
Voting rights.

Only members of an association have the right to vote; and no member is entitled to more than one vote on any question or matter affecting the association or relating to its affairs. Proxy voting is prohibited.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-10

.

7-7-11.
Limited liability of members and stockholders.

No member or stockholder of an association is liable for its debts or obligations beyond the unpaid amount, if any, due by him or her on his or her membership dues or stock issued to him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-11

.

7-7-12.
Transfer of stock.

The transfer of common stock of an association is restricted to persons engaged in the production of the products handled by an association subject to any provisions in its articles or bylaws consistent with this chapter. An association may provide in its articles or bylaws that it is to have the prior right to purchase, on any terms that it determines, any of its common stock that may be offered for sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-12

.

7-7-13.
Restriction on dividends.

No association formed under this chapter shall pay over eight percent (8%) per annum on its capital stock or membership capital.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-13

.

7-7-14.
Directors — Meetings of association.

The bylaws of each association shall provide for the management of the association by a board of not less than five (5) directors, who shall be elected by the members in any manner, at any times, and for any terms that the bylaws prescribe. Regular meetings of the association shall be held at any places and at any times that the bylaws prescribe. The board of directors may hold special and adjourned meetings and may call a special meeting of the association at any time. Ten percent (10%) of the members may file a petition stating the specific business to be brought before the association and demand a special meeting at any time. The meeting must at that time be called by the directors. Notice of all meetings, together with a statement of the purposes of the meeting, shall be mailed to each member at least five (5) days prior to the meeting. However, the bylaws may require instead that the notice may be given by publication in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the territory in which the association has its membership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 8; P.L. 1932, ch. 1917, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-14

.

7-7-15.
Amendment of articles.

The articles of association of any association formed under this chapter may be changed or amended. Any change or amendment must first be approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the directors of an association and then must be adopted by a majority of its members through their vote on it or their written assent to it. An original and a duplicate of any amendment adopted, with a statement showing that the amendment has been adopted by vote of the members and the date of adoption, signed and sworn to by the president or vice-president and the secretary or assistant secretary of the corporation, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state, who shall, upon the payment to him or her of a fee of five dollars ($5.00), certify the duplicate and issue the certificate to the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-15

; P.L. 1971, ch. 164, § 2.

7-7-16.
Marketing contract — Enforcement.

The marketing contract of any association formed under this chapter may fix as liquidated damages, specific, reasonable sums to be paid by a member to the association upon the breach by him or her of any provisions of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of products. It may also provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association, and any provisions are valid and enforceable in the courts of this state. In the event of a breach, or threatened breach, of the marketing contract by a member, the board of directors may authorize one of the executive officers of the association to apply to the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol for an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and for a decree for the specific performance of the contract. Pending the adjudication of the petition, the court, upon the filing of a sufficient bond by the association, may grant any temporary relief that seems to it just and proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-16

.

7-7-17.
Annual report — Examination of books.

Every association formed under this chapter shall submit an annual statement, sworn to by one of the officers of the association, to the director of environmental management, subject to any regulations that he or she prescribes, on forms furnished by or satisfactory to him or her, showing the number of members of the association, the amount of money received by it from every source, an itemized list of all expenses of the association, the amount of its indebtedness or liabilities, and its balance sheets. The director of the department of environmental management, or his or her representative, has the right to examine and audit the books of any association at any time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-17

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1.

7-7-18.
Federation and cooperation between associations.

To effectuate the formation of federations of nonprofit associations of producers, any association of producers is authorized to acquire membership or stock in any other association of producers and any association is authorized to grant membership or sell stock to the associations. Any association may, upon resolution adopted by its board of directors, enter into all necessary and proper contracts and agreements, and make all necessary and proper stipulations, agreements, and contracts with any other cooperative corporation, association, or associations, formed in this or in any other state, for the cooperative and more economical carrying on of its business, or any part of carrying on business. Any two (2) or more associations may, by agreement, unite in employing and using, or may separately employ and use, the same methods, means, and agencies for carrying on and conducting their respective businesses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-18

.

7-7-19.
Use of name restricted to associations under chapter.

No corporation or other organization dealing in agricultural products, or engaged in any of the purposes enumerated in §

7-7-2

, shall use the term “cooperative” as part of its name unless organized under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-19

.

7-7-20.
Application of general corporation law.

The provisions of the general corporation law of this state, and all powers and rights under that law, apply to the associations organized under this chapter, except where the provisions are in conflict with, or inconsistent with, the express provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-20

.

7-7-21.
Annual tax.

Each association organized under the provisions of this chapter shall pay to the state an annual tax of five dollars ($5.00) that shall be assessed by the tax administrator at the same time and in the same manner, and is due and payable to, and may be collected by, the general treasurer at the same time and in the same manner as the annual corporation franchise tax provided for by §

44-12-1

[repealed] is assessed, due, payable, and collected; and the association is exempt from all state taxes except the one prescribed in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-21

.

7-7-22.
Previously incorporated associations.

A cooperative corporation or association previously formed under, or subject to, a law repealed by this chapter, is subject to the provisions of this chapter as if incorporated under this chapter, and the corporation or association may continue its corporate existence and name, subject to the provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1202, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 117, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

7-7-22

.